Montana, session 2025, HB923.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Department to amend rule. By January 1, 2026, the The department of environmental
quality shall amend ARM 17.30.716 to provide for a categorical exclusion from a nondegradation authorization
provided in 75-5-3 17 if a county commission demonstrates to the department that the commission has
established an area where:
(1) drinking water wells are prohibited; and
(2) the absorption trench is at least 1,000 feet from downstream high-quality surface waters insert
a new subsection (8) that reads:
"(8) A wastewater discharge that otherwise meets the criteria of this rule may be reviewed for
nonsignificance without a background nitrogen sample required in (4)(c)(iii) in settings where ground water
cannot be sampled due to absence or great depth of ground water."
Section 2. Appropriation. There is appropriated $500 from the general fund to the department of
environmental quality for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, to amend the department's rules pursuant to
[section 1] ..
Section 3. Effective dates. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), [this act] is effective on passage
and approval.
(2) [Section 2] is effective July 1, 2025.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 923
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 923
Section 4. Applicability. [This act] applies to applications for nondegradation authorizations received
on or after May 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 923
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 923, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 923
INTRODUCED BY L. JONES, S. GIST, G. OBLANDER
AN ACT REVISING CATEGORICAL EXCLUSIONS FROM A NONDEGRADATION AUTHORIZATION;
DIRECTING THE AMENDMENT OF ARM 17.30.716; PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION; AND PROVIDING
EFFECTIVE DATES AND AN APPLICABILITY DATE.”